Utah statutes.
31A-34-105.   Association requirements.

(1)  A nonprofit corporation organized under Title 16, Chapter 6a, Utah Revised Nonprofit Corporation Act, may only hold itself out as a voluntary health insurance purchasing association if it:

(a)  is organized by participating employers;

(b)  is governed and controlled by participating employers;

(c)  does not bear risk; and

(d)  has filed with the commissioner:

(i)  its articles of incorporation and bylaws; and

(ii)  a completed form provided by the department.

(2)  A voluntary health insurance purchasing association is not an alliance under this chapter, is not exempt from state or federal antitrust laws, and is therefore not subject to the regulation of this chapter, except as provided in this section.



Amended by Chapter 300, 2000 General Session

